Nebraska, session 109, LB987.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 14 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Vision Benefit Plan Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Vision Benefit Plan Act:
(1) Chargeback means a dollar amount, fee, surcharge, rebate, or
item of value that reduces, modifies, or offsets all or part of the
enrollee's responsibility, provider reimbursement, allowed amount, or fee
schedule for a covered service or covered material;
(2) Covered materials means materials for which reimbursement from
an insurer, vision benefit manager, or subcontractor is provided to an
eye care provider by an enrollee's plan contract, or for which a
reimbursement would be available but for the application of the
enrollee's contractual limitations of deductibles, copayments, or
coinsurance, regardless of how the materials are listed or described in
an enrollee's benefit plan's definition of benefits;
(3) Covered services means the professional work performed by an eye
care provider for which reimbursements for an insurer, vision benefit
manager, or subcontractor are provided to an eye care provider by an
enrollee's plan contract, or for which a reimbursement would be available
but for the application of the enrollee's contractual plan limitations of
deductibles, copayments, or coinsurance, regardless of how the services
are listed or described in an enrollee's benefit plan's definition of
benefits;
(4) Director means the Director of Insurance;
(5) Enrollee means any individual participating in a health benefit
plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan that is
purchased by an individual or provided to an individual by an entity that
purchases or supplies coverage for a health benefit plan, vision benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan;
(6) Extrapolation means a mathematical formula, process, or
technique used by a vision benefit manager, or the vision benefit
manager's agent, in the audit of an optometrist to estimate audit results
-2-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
or findings for a larger batch of claims not reviewed by the vision
benefit manager;
(7) Eye care provider means a licensed doctor of optometry
practicing under the authority of the Optometry Practice Act or a
licensed medical or osteopathic doctor practicing under the authority of
the Medicine and Surgery Practice Act;
(8) Fee schedule means the document or system that lists the
predetermined payment rates or allowed amounts for covered services or
covered materials and determines how much eye care providers are
reimbursed by the insurer or vision benefit manager and how much patients
are charged by the insurer, vision benefit manager, or eye care provider;
(9) Insurer means an individual, corporation, partnership, company,
organization, group, health maintenance organization, captive risk-
retention group, self-insurance group, optometric service and indemnity
corporation, or other entity, whether organized for profit or not for
profit, whether foreign or domestic, that conducts business in this state
and that offers a vision benefit plan or provides coverage for vision-
related services or vision-related materials to enrollees. For avoidance
of doubt, an entity is considered an insurer for purposes of the Vision
Benefit Plan Act irrespective of (a) its corporate form or category of
licensure, if applicable, including whether it is otherwise subject to
insurance regulations or any other regulations, (b) whether it, either
directly or indirectly, reimburses, indemnifies, pays, or discounts the
costs of vision services or vision materials, or (c) whether it
delegates, assigns, or contracts performance of any function regulated by
the act to an affiliate, subsidiary, contractor, intermediary, or network
leasing entity;
(10) Materials means ophthalmic devices, including, but not limited
to, lenses, devices containing lenses, artificial intraocular lenses,
ophthalmic frames and other lens mounting apparatus, prisms, lens
treatments and coatings, contact lenses, low vision devices, vision
-3-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
therapy devices, and prosthetic devices to correct, relieve, or treat
defects or abnormal conditions of the human eye or its adnexa, or any
material allowed to be utilized by the Board of Optometry and the
Optometry Practice Act;
(11) Nominal means, when there is no corresponding reimbursement in
the current year's published Physician Fee Schedule released annually by
the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or in the current
year's published state medicaid fee schedule, an amount less than the
reasonable compensation to the eye care provider rendering the covered
service or covered materials, taking into account the provider's direct
and indirect costs, including the actual acquisition costs and actual pro
rata overhead costs and reasonable profit;
(12) Participating eye care provider means an eye care provider that
has entered into a contractual agreement or other business relationship
with an insurer, vision benefit manager, third-party administrator, or
subcontractor to provide covered services or covered materials;
(13) Subcontractor means an individual, company, organization,
group, or other entity, including, but not limited to, agents, servants,
brokers, wholesalers, distributors, partially owned or wholly owned
subsidiaries, and controlled organizations, that is contracted by the
vision benefit manager to supply services or materials to another vision
benefit manager, eye care provider, or enrollee to execute or fulfill the
health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan
of a vision benefit manager;
(14) Vision benefit discount plan means a policy, contract, or
agreement offered by an insurer or vision benefit manager to an enrollee
that solely provides for a discount for vision care services or
materials;
(15) Vision benefit manager means an individual, company,
organization, group, or other entity, including, but not limited to, an
insurer, a third-party administrator, and a subcontractor, that creates,
-4-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
promotes, sells, provides, advertises, or administers an integrated or
stand-alone vision benefit plan, vision benefit discount plan, or other
insurance policy or contract which provides vision benefits or discounts
to an enrollee pertaining to the provision of covered services or covered
materials; and
(16) Vision benefit plan means a policy, contract, agreement, or any
prepaid vision plan offered by an insurer or vision benefit manager to an
enrollee to pay for, reimburse, discount, or offset healthcare costs.
Sec. 3. (1) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall disclose the
following information publicly on its website and with all documents and
document packages, including, but not limited to, proposals, responses to
requests for proposals, sales documents, enrollment documents, benefit
plan documents, purchaser contracts, enrollee contracts, and provider
agreements that are presented to purchasers, potential purchasers,
enrollees, potential enrollees, participating eye care providers,
potential participating providers, and state agencies with
jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement authority over its business:
(a) Its legal name and entity type;
(b) Its legal address and the state in which the legal entity is
formed or organized;
(c) The physical address, mailing address, electronic mail address,
and phone number of its operational headquarters;
(d) The agencies, departments, committees, commissions, and other
bodies that have jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement authority
over its business;
(e) A statement that no jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement
authority exists over its business, if none exists;
(f) The names, physical addresses, mailing addresses, electronic
mail addresses, and phone numbers of all parent companies, related
holding companies, wholly owned subsidiary companies, and partially owned
subsidiary companies;
-5-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
(g) All federal and state litigation in which the insurer or vision
benefit manager is, or has been, a party in the current year and during
the preceding five years; and
(h) All formal complaints to the Department of Insurance against the
insurer or vision benefit manager in the current year and during the
preceding five years by purchasers, enrollees, or eye care providers.
(2) All information required to be disclosed by an insurer or vision
benefit manager in subsection (1) of this section shall be conveyed in
plain language, shall be typed with a minimum of ten-point font size, and
shall be prominently displayed:
(a) On the insurer's or vision benefit manager's website in a
publicly accessible section titled "Required Transparency Information for
Patients, Doctors, and Purchasers"; and
(b) In a separately created document titled "Required Transparency
Information for Patients, Doctors, and Purchasers" that shall be included
with all documents and document packages, including, but not limited to,
proposals, responses to requests for proposals, benefit plan documents,
sales documents, enrollment documents, purchaser contracts, enrollee
contracts, and provider agreements.
(3) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall provide notice to
each participating eye care provider of any proposed amendments to
existing provider agreements, fee schedules, provider handbooks, provider
manuals, or related policy documents via electronic mail.
(4) A participating eye care provider shall be provided with a
minimum of ninety calendar days from the time of distribution to review
changes and respond, if necessary, to any proposed amendments from an
insurer or vision benefit manager to existing provider agreements, fee
schedules, provider handbooks, provider manuals, or related policy
documents. Any such proposed amendments proffered by the insurer or
vision benefit manager in violation of this subsection shall be void and
unenforceable as a matter of law.
-6-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
(5) Any proposed amendments to existing provider agreements, fee
schedules, provider handbooks, provider manuals, or related policy
documents by an insurer or vision benefit manager delivered to a
participating eye care provider shall be:
(a) Enumerated in a cover letter;
(b) Marked with highlights or in tracked changes within the
applicable agreements or documents to clearly display all changes over
the previous version; and
(c) Structured to include implications of agreeance or non-agreeance
by the participating eye care provider.
(6) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall maintain:
(a) A phone number to company representatives to receive questions
and communications from participating eye care providers at all times
during standard business hours;
(b) The ability for an eye care provider to leave voice messages at
all times; and
(c) The ability for an eye care provider to have a live phone
discussion with a company representative within twenty-four hours of an
initial phone call or a voice message left with the insurer or vision
benefit manager.
(7) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall maintain a physical
mailing address and an electronic mail address to company representatives
to receive questions, disputes, and communications from participating eye
care providers about all matters, at all times, including, but not
limited to, proposed amendments to existing provider agreements, fee
schedules, provider handbooks, provider manuals, and related policy
documents, and shall publish instructions for mail submission and
electronic mail submission of questions, disputes, and communications in
a place visible to participating eye care providers, including on its
website and in any provider agreements, provider handbooks, provider
manuals, or related policy documents.
-7-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
(8) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall acknowledge receipt
of an electronic mail message within one hour by use of a return
electronic mail message with a communication tracking number and shall
respond to the substantive questions or communications of the electronic
mail message within seventy-two hours in writing by use of a return
electronic mail message.
(9) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall, at all times, make
available to the eye care provider the most up-to-date provider
agreements, fee schedules, provider handbooks, provider manuals, and
related policy documents via website access.
(10) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not engage in
marketing or advertising activities that are misleading or deceptive to
the public. Such acts are considered deceptive trade practices and
subject to penalty under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.
(11) Upon request by a state agency with jurisdictional, regulatory,
or enforcement authority over its business, an insurer or vision benefit
manager shall submit all information related to a health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan, including, but not
limited to, proposals, responses to requests for proposals, benefit plan
documents, sales documents, enrollment documents, purchaser contracts,
enrollee contracts, provider agreements, and marketing and advertising
activities, for review.
Sec. 4. (1) No agreement or contract between an insurer or vision
benefit manager and an eye care provider may seek to or require that an
eye care provider provide services or materials at a fee limited or set
by the insurer or vision benefit manager unless the services or materials
are defined and reimbursed as covered services or covered materials under
the agreement or contract.
(2) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall only use standardized
codes, names, descriptions, and definitions published in the Healthcare
Common Procedure Coding System, including Current Procedural Terminology
-8-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
codes published by the American Medical Association and Level II codes
published by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to
identify and describe covered services and covered materials of the
vision benefit plan to purchasers, enrollees, and eye care providers of
the vision benefit plan.
(3) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall adhere to the
standardized codes, names, descriptions, and definitions published in the
Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System, including all Current
Procedural Terminology codes published by the American Medical
Association and all Level II codes published by the federal Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, to create and offer a fee schedule for
covered services and covered materials in an agreement between the
insurer or vision benefit manager and an eye care provider.
(4) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not attempt to alter
the meaning of any of the standardized codes, names, descriptions, or
definitions published in the Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System,
including all Current Procedural Terminology codes published by the
American Medical Association and all Level II codes published by the
federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. Any such contractual
language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit
manager in violation of this subsection shall be void and unenforceable
as a matter of law.
(5) All fee schedules in an agreement between an insurer or vision
benefit manager and an eye care provider and all reimbursements paid by
an insurer or vision benefit manager to an eye care provider for all
covered services and covered materials shall not be nominal or de
minimis. There shall be no limitation on the ability of an individual eye
care provider or a group of eye care providers who practice under a
single employer identification number or tax identification number to
engage in direct negotiations with the insurer or vision benefit manager
regarding reimbursement fee schedules and ultimately agreeing to a
-9-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
different fee schedule than the fee schedule provided by the insurer or
vision benefit manager to other participating providers or groups.
(6) All fee schedule allowed amounts and all reimbursements paid by
an insurer or vision benefit manager for each covered service and covered
material shall be clearly and individually listed on a fee schedule made
available to the eye care provider:
(a) At the time an agreement is offered to the eye care provider by
an insurer or vision benefit manager;
(b) Within fifteen business days from the date an application is
made to become a participating eye care provider with the insurer or
vision benefit manager by the eye care provider; and
(c) At all times via electronic means to the participating eye care
provider.
(7) A contract between an insurer or vision benefit manager and an
eye care provider shall include a fee schedule that includes and
individually identifies each covered service and covered material and its
corresponding allowed amount, reimbursement amount paid to the eye care
provider, and any form of a cost-sharing amount paid by the enrollee to
the eye care provider.
(8) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not advertise, claim,
or represent to purchasers or enrollees that services and materials
provided by a participating eye care provider are covered, included, or
covered with an additional deductible, copay, or coinsurance if the
insurer or vision benefit manager does not remit an actual payment to the
participating eye care provider as full or partial reimbursement for the
service or material.
(9) A service or material provided by a participating eye care
provider cannot be designated as a covered service or covered material by
the insurer or vision benefit manager in the design of a health benefit
plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan if the
reimbursement amount to the participating eye care provider is only
-10-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
comprised of an enrollee's payment to the participating eye care
provider.
(10) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not condition
application to or network participation in a health benefit plan, vision
benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan by an eye care provider
based on the eye care provider's usual and customary pricing or discounts
on usual and customary pricing for services or materials that are not
covered services or not covered materials. Any such contractual language,
policies, or procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit manager in
violation of this subsection shall be void and unenforceable as a matter
of law.
(11) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not make conditional
a fee schedule proposed or made to an eye care provider of a health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan for
covered services or covered materials based on the eye care provider's
usual and customary pricing or discounts on usual and customary pricing
for services or materials that are not covered services or not covered
materials. Any such contractual language, policies, or procedures set by
the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of this subsection
shall be void and unenforceable as a matter of law.
(12) A contract between an insurer or vision benefit manager and an
eye care provider shall not contain a provision, fee schedule, or
reimbursement amount in which the eye care provider, with consideration
of any applicable deductibles, copays, coinsurances, discounts, rebates,
or chargebacks, provides covered services or covered materials to an
enrollee at a financial loss. Any such contractual language, policies, or
procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of
this subsection shall be void and unenforceable as a matter of law.
(13) The period of time prescribed by a contract between any insurer
or vision benefit manager and an eye care provider for the insurer or
vision benefit manager to recover any reimbursement amount from an eye
-11-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
care provider shall be the same period of time allowed or required for
any insurer or vision benefit manager to remit the applicable
reimbursement following an eye care provider's submission of a clean
claim for services rendered or materials furnished. This subsection shall
not limit the ability of an insurer or vision benefit manager to conduct
an audit of claims, in accordance with the insurer's or vision benefit
manager's written policies and applicable law, in the event that the
insurer or vision benefit manager has a reasonable belief that the eye
care provider has engaged in fraud, waste, or abuse.
(14) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not falsely represent
the number of participating providers in a region or the benefits that
comprise a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit
discount plan to clients, groups, employers, purchasers, companies,
enrollees, or prospective enrollees. Such acts are considered deceptive
trade practices and subject to penalty under the Uniform Deceptive Trade
Practices Act.
(15) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not promote or use
in any marketing or advertising for a health benefit plan, vision benefit
plan, or vision benefit discount plan that a covered service or covered
material is free, no charge, complimentary, or any materially similar
language to induce a client, group, employer, purchaser, company,
enrollee, or prospective enrollee to purchase services, materials,
supplies, or plans from the insurer, vision benefit manager, or an
affiliate of the insurer or vision benefit manager.
(16) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not offer enrollees
of a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount
plan varying deductibles, copays, coinsurances, coverage amounts,
rebates, gift cards, or other monetary or nonmonetary incentives to
obtain covered services, covered materials, noncovered services, or
noncovered materials:
(a) At any particular participating eye care provider;
-12-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
(b) At a retail establishment owned by, partially owned by,
contracted with, or otherwise affiliated with the insurer or vision
benefit manager; or
(c) At any Internet or virtual provider or retailer owned by,
partially owned by, contracted with, or otherwise affiliated with the
insurer or vision benefit manager.
(17) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall remit to the
participating eye care provider the contracted reimbursement amount from
the fee schedule for a covered service or covered material provided to an
enrollee if the enrollee is verified to be eligible by the participating
eye care provider through customary verification methods of the insurer
or vision benefit manager to receive the covered service or covered
material on the date of service.
(18) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not retroactively
reverse a reimbursement or withhold a future reimbursement to a
participating eye care provider who relied in good faith on an
individual's presented coverage credentials and the customary
verification methods of the insurer or vision benefit manager if the
vision benefit manager later determines that the enrollee was ineligible
to receive covered services or covered materials on the date of service.
(19) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not require a
participating eye care provider, purchaser, or enrollee of a health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan to
obtain prior authorization, preauthorization, precertification, or any
similar mechanism that restricts the enrollee from receiving a covered
service or covered material recommended by the eye care provider and
requested by the enrollee.
(20) Participating eye care providers are allowed, but not required,
to offer an enrollee the opportunity to pay the participating eye care
provider directly for covered services and covered materials if such
direct payment would be less costly to the enrollee than the total out-
-13-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
of-pocket cost required under the terms of a health benefit plan or
vision benefit plan. A provider may not be subject to an audit, removed
from participation in the network, or otherwise penalized or
discriminated against in any manner for offering an enrollee the
opportunity to pay the participating provider directly under the
conditions described in this subsection.
(21)(a) Insurers or vision benefit managers shall not, in the course
of adjudicating a claim for reimbursement by a participating eye care
provider for a covered service or covered material, alter, delete,
substitute, or otherwise change any code or modifier submitted by the eye
care provider, including by downcoding, bundling, or reassigning to a
different code, if such change would reduce payment or otherwise
adversely affect the provider or enrollee.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Bundling means to combine, substitute, or treat two or more
distinct services, supplies, or materials reported on the same claim or
date of service as included within a single code, package, or global
service, and denying, reducing, or disallowing separate reimbursement for
one or more of these codes; and
(ii) Downcoding means to alter, delete, substitute, or assign a code
that results in a lower level of service, a lower-valued code, or a
reduced reimbursement amount relative to the code submitted by the eye
care provider.
(22) All provisions of this section shall apply to all affiliates,
parent companies, third-party administrators, and subcontractors that are
used by an insurer or vision benefit manager to supply covered services
or covered materials to an eye care provider or enrollee, and such
affiliates, parent companies, third-party administrators, and
subcontractors shall be subject to all applicable penalties as provided
in this section.
(23) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not require or
-14-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
request an eye care provider to opt in or opt out of the provisions set
forth in the Vision Benefit Plan Act.
Sec. 5. (1) No agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall require that an eye care provider
must participate with, be credentialed by, or enter into an agreement
with any specific vision benefit plan or vision benefit discount plan as
a condition for participation in the health benefit plan provider network
of the insurer or vision benefit manager to provide covered services or
covered materials to the enrollees of the health benefit plan.
(2) No agreement between an insurer or vision benefit manager and an
eye care provider shall require that an eye care provider must
participate with, be credentialed by, or enter into an agreement with any
specific health benefit plan as a condition for participation in the
vision benefit plan or vision benefit discount plan provider network of
the insurer or vision benefit manager to provide covered services or
covered materials to the enrollees of the vision benefit plan or vision
benefit discount plan.
(3) Any insurer or vision benefit manager issuing or renewing a
health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan
which provides benefits for covered services or covered materials
rendered by a physician or osteopath duly licensed under the Medicine and
Surgery Practice Act that are within the scope of practice of an
optometrist duly licensed under the Optometry Practice Act shall provide
the same reimbursement for covered services or covered materials to
optometrists as allowed for those covered services or covered materials
rendered by physicians or osteopaths.
(4) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall apply the same terms
and conditions of participation for all eye care providers, irrespective
of their educational credentials, subject to the permitted scope of
practice for the provider under applicable state law.
(5) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not require an eye
-15-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
care provider to possess, offer, procure, or sell materials or covered
materials in the provider's office as a condition of participation in the
provider network of the health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or
vision benefit discount plan. Any such contractual language, policies, or
procedures set by the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of
this subsection shall be void and unenforceable as a matter of law.
(6) If an eye care provider enters into any subcontract agreement
with another provider to provide his or her licensed health care services
to an enrollee or a covered dependent of an enrollee of a health benefit
plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan where the
subcontracted provider will seek reimbursement from the plan or enrollee
for the subcontracted services, the subcontract agreement must meet all
requirements of the Vision Benefit Plan Act.
(7) The provisions of this section shall apply to any agreements an
insurer or vision benefit manager enters into with another entity to
provide an enrollee with covered services or covered materials.
Sec. 6. (1) It is prohibited for an insurer or vision benefit
manager that offers multiple health benefit plans, vision benefit plans,
or vision benefit discount plans to require an eye care provider, as a
condition of participation in the network for a health benefit plan,
vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan, to participate in
the network of any of the insurer's or vision benefit manager's other
health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount
plans. A contract provision violating this subsection is void as a matter
of law.
(2) It is prohibited for an insurer or vision benefit manager that
offers multiple health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision
benefit discount plans to withhold participation in the network of one or
more of the insurer's or vision benefit manager's other health benefit
plans, vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount plans if the eye
care provider, having completed the credentialing requirements of the
-16-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
insurer or vision benefit manager for participation, is already
participating in the network of one or more of the insurer's or vision
benefit manager's health benefit plans, vision benefit plans, or vision
benefit discount plans and seeks to participate in the network of the
insurer's or vision benefit manager's other health benefit plans, vision
benefit plans, or vision benefit discount plans.
(3) Subsections (1) and (2) of this section apply to all plan types
that a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit
discount plan sells, administers, or offers, including, but not limited
to, individually purchased plans, employer-sponsored plans, and
government-sponsored plans.
Sec. 7. (1) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall include on
its website:
(a) A method for an eye care provider to submit an application for
inclusion and credentialing as a participating provider in the health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan; and
(b) A description of the credentialing requirements, which must be
reasonable, related to the delivery of covered eye care services, and
applied in an objective, uniform, and nondiscriminatory manner.
(2) An insurer's or vision benefit manager's application for
inclusion and credentialing as a participating eye care provider in the
health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan
must impose the same application and credentialing requirements on each
eye care provider.
(3) No later than the tenth business day after the date the insurer
or vision benefit manager receives an application from an eye care
provider for inclusion and credentialing as a participating provider in
the health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount
plan, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall make available
electronically to the eye care provider a proposed participating provider
agreement, including applicable fee schedules, provider handbooks, and
-17-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
provider manuals.
(4) No later than the thirtieth business day after the date the
insurer or vision benefit manager receives an application from an eye
care provider for inclusion and credentialing as a participating provider
in the health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit
discount plan, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall complete the
credentialing determination of the eye care provider, approve or
disapprove the application of the eye care provider, and deliver
electronically a proposed participating provider agreement described in
subsection (3) of this section for acceptance and signature of the
approved eye care provider.
(5) If the application for inclusion and credentialing as a
participating provider is denied by the insurer or vision benefit
manager, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall deliver to the
applicant eye care provider a detailed explanation for the denial both
electronically and in writing via certified mail.
(6) If the application for inclusion and credentialing as a
participating provider is denied by the insurer or vision benefit
manager, the eye care provider must be allowed a reasonable period of
time in which to appeal the decision to the insurer or vision benefit
manager and provide in the appeal evidence that supports the
reconsideration of the denied application. The insurer or vision benefit
manager shall consider, and render a decision on, the eye care provider's
appeal submission within thirty days of the date of receipt of the
submission by the insurer or vision benefit manager.
(7) If the appeal of the application denial for inclusion and
credentialing as a participating provider is denied by the insurer or
vision benefit manager, the insurer or vision benefit manager shall
deliver to the applicant eye care provider a detailed explanation for the
denial of the appeal both electronically and in writing via certified
mail.
-18-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
(8) An insurer or vision benefit manager, concurrent with the
electronic delivery of the proposed participating provider agreement to
the approved eye care provider pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section, must provide the name, email address, and phone number of a
representative of the insurer or vision benefit manager to allow the
approved eye care provider the opportunity to:
(a) Contact the representative before signing the agreement;
(b) Discuss the proposed agreement with the representative before
signing the agreement; and
(c) Electronically send the representative modifications to the
proposed agreement before signing the agreement.
(9) In the event that the approved eye care provider sends the
representative of the insurer or vision benefit manager modifications to
the proposed participating provider agreement pursuant to subdivision (8)
(c) of this section, the insurer or vision benefit manager must respond
to the submission of the approved eye care provider within five business
days. Each subsequent response made by the insurer, vision benefit
manager, or approved eye care provider to the other party must be
responded to within five business days by the receiving party.
(10) Once the insurer or vision benefit manager has approved and
delivered electronically a proposed participating provider agreement
pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the approved eye care
provider has a total allotted timeframe of ninety business days to reach
agreement with the insurer or vision benefit manager and sign a
participating provider agreement. If the parties fail to reach agreement
and no participating provider agreement is signed by the approved eye
care provider within the allotted timeframe, the insurer or vision
benefit manager may retract the participating provider agreement.
(11) No later than the twentieth business day after the date the
approved eye care provider signs a participating provider agreement, the
insurer or vision benefit manager shall include the credentialed and
-19-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
approved eye care provider as a participating provider in the health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan and
list the eye care provider in all of the plan's directories that are
available to enrollees and the public.
(12) The earliest that an eye care provider may submit another
application to an insurer or vision benefit manager after a previous
approval and subsequent unsuccessful attempt to negotiate a mutually
acceptable participating provider agreement is one hundred eighty
calendar days from the date of submission of the previous application.
(13) The earliest that an eye care provider may submit another
application to an insurer or vision benefit manager after a previous
disapproval of an application is one hundred eighty calendar days from
the date of submission of the previous application.
(14) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall allow an eye care
provider to become a participating provider in the network of a health
benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision benefit discount plan if the
eye care provider (a) meets the credentialing requirements of the insurer
or vision benefit manager and (b) agrees in writing to the applicable
provider agreement.
(15) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not exclude an eye
care provider from applying to, or becoming a participating provider in,
the network of a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision
benefit discount plan because of:
(a) The aggregate number of eye care providers in a state, county,
city, zip code, or other geographically defined service area;
(b) The time, distance, or appointment availability for an enrollee
to access a participating eye care provider; or
(c) The provider's professional designation, independent practice
affiliation, or participation status in other health benefit plans,
vision benefit plans, or vision benefit discount plans.
Sec. 8. (1) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not change
-20-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
or alter a provider agreement, including terms, reimbursements, fee
schedules, policies, procedures, or provider manuals incorporated by
reference into the provider agreement, entered into with a participating
eye care provider unless the insurer or vision benefit manager performs
the following steps at least ninety days before the date the proposed
change would take effect:
(a) A certified letter, or an electronic communication requiring an
electronic signature proving receipt, clearly detailing the proposed
changes must be sent to the eye care provider;
(b) A face-to-face or virtual meeting must be held to discuss
proposed changes if requested by the eye care provider;
(c) The eye care provider must either agree to or protest in writing
the proposed changes. If the changes are not agreed to by the eye care
provider, then the current agreement shall continue and the insurer or
vision benefit manager shall not remove the eye care provider from
participation with a health benefit plan, vision benefit plan, or vision
benefit discount plan for not accepting the proposed changes; and
(d) Any proposed amendment to an existing provider agreement must be
presented to the participating eye care provider in a manner conducive to
the eye care provider's review. The proposed changes shall be (i)
enumerated in a cover letter and (ii) clearly marked in tracked changes
within the body of the applicable agreement.
(2) Termination of any provider agreement shall be permissible only
in the event of a material breach, wherein the eye care provider fails to
remedy the alleged breach to the reasonable satisfaction of the insurer
or vision benefit manager within thirty days of receipt of written notice
specifying the alleged breach.
(3) It shall be prohibited for an insurer or vision benefit manager
to require an eye care provider to establish a security interest in all
or part of the provider's property and assets, including assets
pertaining to the provider's practice, in a sum equivalent to the funds
-21-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
owed to the insurer or vision benefit manager at termination. Any such
contractual language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer or
vision benefit manager in violation of this subsection shall be void and
unenforceable as a matter of law.
(4) A provider agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall not contain a provision requiring
the provider to accept a reimbursement payment in the form of a virtual
credit card or any other payment method wherein a processing fee,
administrative fee, percentage amount, or dollar amount is assessed for
the provider to receive the reimbursement payment.
(5) A provider agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall not contain a provision obligating
the eye care provider to share equally the expenses of arbitration. Any
such contractual language, policies, or procedures set by the insurer or
vision benefit manager in violation of this subsection shall be void and
unenforceable as a matter of law. Each party shall bear their own
arbitration costs, contingent upon a fee-shifting provision that grants
prevailing party status.
(6) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not retaliate in any
manner against an eye care provider for discussing, or attempting in good
faith to negotiate, the terms and provisions of a provider agreement with
the insurer or vision benefit manager.
(7) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not retaliate in any
manner against an eye care provider for filing a complaint against the
insurer or vision benefit manager with any state agency with
jurisdictional, regulatory, or enforcement authority over the business of
the insurer or vision benefit manager.
(8) Should retaliation by an insurer or vision benefit manager occur
against an eye care provider in violation of subsection (6) or (7) of
this section, a state agency that has jurisdictional, regulatory, or
enforcement authority over the business of the insurer or vision benefit
-22-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
manager may sanction the insurer or vision benefit manager, including
fines and other remedies deemed appropriate, and provide an appropriate
remedy for the aggrieved eye care provider.
Sec. 9. (1) No agreement between an insurer or vision benefit
manager and an eye care provider shall restrict or limit, either directly
or indirectly, the eye care provider's choice or use of sources and
suppliers of covered or uncovered services or materials, including the
choice or use of optical laboratories, provided by the eye care provider
to an enrollee. Any such contractual language, policies, or procedures
set by the insurer or vision benefit manager in violation of this
subsection shall be void and unenforceable as a matter of law.
(2) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not directly or
indirectly:
(a) Control or attempt to control the professional judgment, manner
of practice, or practice of an eye care provider;
(b) Employ an eye care provider to provide a covered service or
covered material;
(c) Reimburse an eye care provider a different amount for covered
services or covered materials because of the eye care provider's choice
of:
(i) Optical laboratory;
(ii) Source of supplier of:
(A) Contact lenses;
(B) Ophthalmic lenses;
(C) Ophthalmic glasses frames; or
(D) Covered or noncovered services or materials;
(iii) Equipment used for patient care;
(iv) Retail optical affiliation;
(v) Vision support organization;
(vi) Group purchasing organization;
(vii) Doctor alliance;
-23-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
(viii) Professional trade association membership;
(ix) Electronic health record software, electronic medical record
software, or practice management software; or
(x) Third-party claim filing service, billing service, or electronic
data interchange clearinghouse company;
(d) Restrict, limit, or influence an eye care provider's choice of
sources or suppliers of services or materials, including optical
laboratories used by the eye care provider to provide services or
materials to the enrollee;
(e) Restrict, limit, or influence an eye care provider's choice of
electronic health record software, electronic medical record software, or
practice management software;
(f) Restrict, limit, or influence an eye care provider's choice of
third-party claim filing service, billing service, or electronic data
interchange clearinghouse company;
(g) Restrict or limit an eye care provider's access to an enrollee's
complete plan coverage information, including in-network and out-of-
network coverage details;
(h) Apply a chargeback to an enrollee or eye care provider if the
chargeback is for a covered product or service for which the insurer or
vision benefit manager does not incur the cost to produce, deliver, or
provide such product or service to the enrollee or eye care provider;
(i) Require an eye care provider to disclose an enrollee's
confidential or protected health information unless the disclosure is
expressly authorized by the enrollee, or permitted without authorization
under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996;
(j) Require an eye care provider to disclose or report a medical
history or diagnosis as a condition to file a claim, adjudicate a claim,
or receive reimbursement for a routine or wellness eye exam; or
(k) Require an eye care provider to disclose or report an enrollee's
glasses prescription, contact lens prescription, ophthalmic device
-24-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
measurements, facial photograph, or unique anatomical measurements as a
condition to file a claim, adjudicate a claim, or receive reimbursement
for a claim, unless the information is needed for the vision benefit
manager to manufacture, or cause to be manufactured, a covered product
that is submitted on the applicable claim.
(3) An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not solicit patients
or referrals for supplies on behalf of itself or its affiliates by
identifying participating eye care providers in an inaccurate or
otherwise misleading manner in any list of participating providers or in
any communications to purchasers or enrollees. All communications which
distinguish between participating eye care providers, or which otherwise
claim professional superiority or the performance of a professional
service in a superior manner, based on the following characteristics
shall be readily subject to verification by the Department of Insurance:
(a) A discount or incentive offered by the participating eye care
provider on services and materials that are not covered by the insurer or
vision benefit manager;
(b) The dollar amount, volume amount, or percent usage amount of any
material, product, or good purchased by the participating eye care
provider; or
(c) The brand, source, manufacturer, or supplier of a covered
service or covered material utilized by the participating eye care
provider.
(4) For the avoidance of doubt, this section does not prohibit
advertising, provided that such advertising is (a) not false, misleading,
or deceptive or (b) readily subject to verification.
Sec. 10. An insurer or vision benefit manager shall not use
extrapolation to complete an audit of a participating eye care provider.
Any additional payment due to a participating eye care provider or any
refund due to the insurer or vision benefit manager shall not be based on
an extrapolation, but shall be based on the actual overpayment or
-25-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
underpayment, as determined after an investigation by the insurer or
vision benefit manager, and after the participating eye care provider has
been afforded, and has exhausted, all opportunities to appeal the
insurer's or vision benefit manager's findings, as set forth in the
provider manual or policy document or applicable law.
Sec. 11. (1) The requirements of the Vision Benefit Plan Act are in
addition to, and do not limit, any other requirement applicable to an
insurer under state law. In the event of a conflict between the act and
another provision of state law applicable to insurers, the provision that
affords greater protection to eye care providers or plan enrollees shall
control.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law, including any
law that purports to be the sole body of law governing the insurer, an
insurer shall comply with the Vision Benefit Plan Act, to the extent not
preempted by federal law.
Sec. 12. The director may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out the Vision Benefit Plan Act.
Sec. 13. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
the director shall enforce the Vision Benefit Plan Act, and any violation
of the act or any rule and regulation adopted and promulgated pursuant to
the act shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance
subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.
(2) The Attorney General shall enforce any violations of the Vision
Benefit Plan Act that are considered to be deceptive trade practices
subject to penalty under the Uniform Deceptive Trade Practices Act.
(3) The director shall provide a mechanism for aggrieved
individuals, whether actively or formerly enrolled with a particular
vision benefit plan, to submit complaints to the director for review,
investigation, and, as appropriate, discipline under applicable law.
(4) The penalties and remedies provided in this section for a
violation of the Vision Benefit Plan Act shall be in addition to any
-26-

LB987 LB987
2026 2026
other penalties and remedies available under state law and shall not
waive, limit, or otherwise affect the applicability of any other law
providing for civil or criminal penalties or remedies for unfair,
deceptive, or unlawful business practices.
Sec. 14. The Vision Benefit Plan Act shall apply to insurer or
vision benefit manager policies, contracts, agreements, and plans
delivered, issued for delivery, continued, or renewed in this state on or
after the operative date of this act.
Sec. 15. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2026.
Sec. 16. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 17. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-27-